Illinois, session 104th, HB3423.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Regulatory Sunset Act is amended by adding 5Section 8.32 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 80/8.32 new)7    Sec. 8.32. Department of Financial and Professional 8Regulation licensure report.9    (a) As used in this Section, "Department" means the 10Department of Financial and Professional Regulation.11    (b) Notwithstanding any section of this Act, the 12Department shall conduct a separate review of each current 13program, including any costs and fees associated with each 14program. The Department shall create a report based on this 15review for each program and deliver the report to the General 16Assembly no later than 12 months prior to the termination of 17each program under this Act. The report must be published on 18the Department's website no later than 30 days prior to the 19date the report is delivered to the General Assembly. The 20report shall include, but is not limited to, the following 21recommendations and any data, assumptions, or other analysis 22utilized to make each recommendation:23        (1) whether the program is necessary to meet a   HB3423- 2 -LRB104 09670 AAS 19736 b1    demonstrated public safety or welfare interest;2        (2) whether the conditions that led to the initial 3    creation of the program have changed and whether other 4    conditions have arisen that would warrant more, less, or 5    the same degree of regulation and oversight;6        (3) if the program is necessary, whether the existing 7    rules and regulations establish the least restrictive form 8    of governmental regulation and oversight consistent with 9    the demonstrated public interest, considering other 10    available regulatory mechanisms;11        (4) if the program is necessary, whether Department 12    rules pertaining to the program enhance the demonstrated 13    public interest and are within the scope of the 14    legislative intent in creating the program;15        (5) the economic impact of the program and, if 16    national economic information is not available, whether 17    the program stimulates or restricts competition;18        (6) the budget and administration of the program, 19    including, but not limited to:20            (A) the adequacy of current staffing levels;21            (B) the cost of required and current staffing 22        levels to meet the needs of the issuance and 23        disciplinary process;24            (C) the adequacy of current physical, software, 25        and technical resources;26            (D) the cost of required and current physical,   HB3423- 3 -LRB104 09670 AAS 19736 b1        software, and technical resources;2            (E) the speed of program application processing 3        and issuance for both original licenses and renewals;4            (F) the cost of program application processing;5            (G) the necessity, efficiency, and efficacy of 6        program disciplinary procedures; and7            (H) the cost of disciplinary action;8        (7) whether complaint, investigation, and disciplinary 9    procedures adequately protect the public and whether final 10    dispositions of complaints are in the demonstrated public 11    interest or are self-serving to the profession or 12    regulated entity;13        (8) whether the scope of practice of the regulated 14    occupation or profession contributes to the optimum use of 15    personnel;16        (9) whether the regulation and administration of the 17    program includes input from numerous stakeholders and the 18    public to ensure fairness;19        (10) whether fees associated with the program are 20    fair, taking into consideration factors that include, but 21    are not limited to, the following:22            (A) the average annual income of an applicant;23            (B) the average annual income of a person in the 24        occupation or profession;25            (C) the cost of education and other requirements 26        necessary to perform the services and duties of the   HB3423- 4 -LRB104 09670 AAS 19736 b1        occupation or profession;2            (D) the cost to the Department of administering 3        the program; and4            (E) if fees are not fair, what a fair fee would 5        look like;6        (11) whether the current number of training, 7    education, and continuing education days are only those 8    demonstrably necessary to protect health and safety;9        (12) whether the Department, via licensing or other 10    programs, imposes any sanctions or disqualifications on 11    applicants based on past criminal history and, if so, 12    whether the sanctions or disqualifications serve a public 13    safety or commercial or consumer protection interest, 14    including data on the following:15            (A) the number of applications that the agency 16        denied based on the applicant's criminal history and 17        the criminal offenses that led to the 18        disqualification;19            (B) the number of licenses or other credentials 20        issued based upon the applicant's criminal history; 21        and22            (C) the number of licenses or other credentials 23        revoked or suspended based on an individual's criminal 24        conduct and the criminal offenses that led to the 25        sanction; and26        (13) whether administrative and statutory changes are   HB3423- 5 -LRB104 09670 AAS 19736 b1    necessary to improve agency operations to enhance the 2    demonstrated public interest or to ensure that program 3    standards for all applicants are not vague and are 4    consistent with the demonstrated public safety or welfare 5    interest necessitating the regulation.6    Nothing in this subsection (b) shall be construed to 7prevent the Department from conducting a review or publishing 8and delivering a report prior to 12 months before the 9termination of the program if the Department reasonably 10believes a different level of regulation is the least 11restrictive level necessary to meet the demonstrated public 12safety or welfare interest or the Department received requests 13to alter the current level of regulation.14    (c) Notwithstanding any section of this Act, the 15Department shall conduct a review of each potential new 16program, including any costs and fees associated with the 17potential new program. The Department shall create a new 18program report based on this review and deliver the report to 19the General Assembly no later than 30 days after the filing 20date of the bill in which the program is proposed. The report 21must be published on the Department's website no later than 22the date the report is delivered to the General Assembly. The 23report shall include, but is not limited to, the following 24recommendations and any data, assumptions, or other analysis 25utilized to make each recommendation:26        (1) whether the program is necessary to meet a   HB3423- 6 -LRB104 09670 AAS 19736 b1    demonstrated public safety or welfare interest;2        (2) the conditions that led to the proposal of the 3    program and whether other conditions have arisen that 4    would warrant more, less, or the same degree of regulation 5    and oversight as that proposed;6        (3) whether the proposed program establishes the least 7    restrictive form of governmental regulation and oversight 8    consistent with the demonstrated public interest, 9    considering other available regulatory mechanisms;10        (4) if the program is necessary, potential Department 11    rules pertaining to the program and how these rules would 12    enhance the demonstrated public interest and are within 13    the scope of legislative intent;14        (5) the estimated economic impact of the program and, 15    if national economic information is not available, whether 16    the program stimulates or restricts competition;17        (6) the budget and administration constraints of the 18    program, including, but not limited to:19            (A) the adequacy of current staffing levels to 20        meet the needs of the issuance and disciplinary 21        process;22            (B) the cost of maintaining appropriate staffing 23        levels;24            (C) the adequacy of current physical, software, 25        and technical resources;26            (D) the cost of additional physical, software, and   HB3423- 7 -LRB104 09670 AAS 19736 b1        technical resources, if necessary;2            (E) the anticipated cost of program application 3        processing; and4            (F) the cost of anticipated program disciplinary 5        procedures;6        (7) whether proposed complaint, investigation, and 7    disciplinary procedures adequately protect the public and 8    whether potential methods of evaluating final dispositions 9    of complaints are in the demonstrated public interest or 10    are self-serving to the profession or regulated entity;11        (8) whether the proposed scope of practice of the 12    regulated occupation or profession contributes to the 13    optimum use of personnel;14        (9) whether the regulation and administration of the 15    program as presented in the bill includes input from 16    numerous stakeholders and the public to ensure fairness, 17    or, if such inclusion may be facilitated by Department 18    rulemaking, what type of rules would ensure such 19    inclusion;20        (10) if a fee amount is proposed in the bill, whether 21    fees associated with the program are fair, taking into 22    consideration factors that include, but are not limited 23    to, the following:24            (A) the average annual income of an applicant;25            (B) the average annual income of a person in the 26        occupation or profession;  HB3423- 8 -LRB104 09670 AAS 19736 b1            (C) the cost of education and other requirements 2        necessary to perform the services and duties of the 3        occupation or profession;4            (D) the cost to the Department of administering 5        the program; and6            (E) if fees are left to the discretion of the 7        Department, an estimate of a fair fee;8        (11) whether the proposed number of training, 9    education, and continuing education days, if any, are only 10    demonstrably necessary to protect health and safety. If no 11    number of training, education, or continuing education 12    days are proposed, a Department estimate thereof;13        (12) whether the Department, through the program 14    proposed, would impose any sanctions or disqualifications 15    on applicants based on past criminal history and, if so, 16    whether the sanctions or disqualifications proposed serve 17    a public safety or commercial or consumer protection 18    interest; and19        (13) whether changes to the language of the bill in 20    which the program is proposed are necessary to improve 21    agency operations to enhance the demonstrated public 22    interest or to ensure program standards for all applicants 23    are not vague and are consistent with the demonstrated 24    public safety or welfare interest necessitating the 25    regulation and suggested language making the changes.26    The Department shall complete a review and report under   HB3423- 9 -LRB104 09670 AAS 19736 b1subsection (b) of this Section for any program reviewed under 2this subsection (c) which becomes law 24 months after the 3effective date of the bill in which the program was proposed 4and shall subsequently conduct review and reporting duties 5under subsection (b) according to the schedule provided 6therein.7    Nothing in this subsection (c) shall be construed to 8prevent the Department from conducting a review or publishing 9and delivering a report hereunder prior to the filing date of a 10piece of legislation if the Department reasonably believes a 11new program is necessary to meet a demonstrated public safety 12or welfare interest or the Department has received requests to 13regulate a previously unregulated profession.